Wisconsin, session 2025, SB524.
do enact as follows:SB524,11Section 1. 134.65 (1a) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB524,2,142134.65 (1a) (b) “Electronic vaping device” means a device that may be used to 3deliver any aerosolized or vaporized liquid or other substance for inhalation, 4regardless of whether the liquid or other substance contains nicotine, including an 5e-cigarette, e-cigar, e-pipe, vape pen, or e-hookah. “Electronic vaping device” 6includes a component, part, or accessory of the device, and includes a liquid or other 7substance that may be aerosolized or vaporized by such device, regardless of 8whether the liquid or other substance contains nicotine. “Electronic vaping device” 9does not include a battery or battery charger when sold separately. “Electronic 10vaping device” does not include drugs, devices, or combination products, as those 11terms are defined in the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, that are authorized 12for sale by the U.S. food and drug administration, as those terms are defined in the 13Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act for the treatment of nicotine addiction or 14tobacco cessation.SB524,215Section 2. 134.66 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB524,2,1716134.66 (title) Restrictions on sale or gift of cigarettes or nicotine, 17electronic vaping devices, or tobacco products.SB524,31Section 3. 134.66 (1) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB524,3,32134.66 (1) (bm) “Electronic vaping device” has the meaning given in s. 134.65 3(1a) (b).SB524,44Section 4. 134.66 (1) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB524,3,85134.66 (1) (g) “Retailer” means any person licensed under s. 134.65 (1d) or any 6person that sells, exposes for sale, possesses with intent to sell, exchanges, barters, 7disposes of, or gives away any electronic vaping device to any person not holding a 8license under s. 134.65, 139.30 to 139.41, or 139.79.SB524,59Section 5. 134.66 (2) (a), (am), (b) and (cm) 1m. of the statutes are amended 10to read:SB524,3,1911134.66 (2) (a) No retailer, direct marketer, manufacturer, distributor, jobber 12or subjobber, no agent, employee or independent contractor of a retailer, direct 13marketer, manufacturer, distributor, jobber or subjobber and no agent or employee 14of an independent contractor may sell or provide for nominal or no consideration 15cigarettes, nicotine products, or tobacco products, or electronic vaping devices to 16any person under the age of 18 21, except as provided in s. 254.92 (2) (a). A vending 17machine operator is not liable under this paragraph for the purchase of cigarettes, 18nicotine products, or tobacco products from his or her vending machine by a person 19under the age of 18 if the vending machine operator was unaware of the purchase.SB524,4,420(am) No retailer, direct marketer, manufacturer, distributor, jobber, 21subjobber, no agent, employee or independent contractor of a retailer, direct 22marketer, manufacturer, distributor, jobber or subjobber and no agent or employee 23of an independent contractor may provide for nominal or no consideration 24cigarettes, nicotine products, or tobacco products, or electronic vaping devices to 1any person except in a place where no person younger than 18 21 years of age is 2present or permitted to enter unless the person who is younger than 18 21 years of 3age is accompanied by his or her parent or guardian or by his or her spouse who has 4attained the age of 18 21 years.SB524,4,95(b) 1. A retailer shall post a sign in areas within his or her premises where 6cigarettes or, tobacco products, nicotine products, or electronic vaping devices are 7sold to consumers stating that the sale of any cigarette or, tobacco product, nicotine 8product, or electronic vaping device to a person under the age of 18 21 is unlawful 9under this section and s. 254.92.SB524,4,14102. A vending machine operator shall attach a notice in a conspicuous place on 11the front of his or her vending machines stating that the purchase of any cigarette 12or, tobacco product, nicotine product, or electronic vaping device by a person under 13the age of 18 21 is unlawful under s. 254.92 and that the purchaser is subject to a 14forfeiture of not to exceed $50.SB524,4,2015(cm) 1m. A retailer or vending machine operator may not sell cigarettes or, 16tobacco products, nicotine products, or electronic vaping devices from a vending 17machine unless the vending machine is located in a place where the retailer or 18vending machine operator ensures that no person younger than 18 21 years of age is 19present or permitted to enter unless he or she is accompanied by his or her parent 20or guardian or by his or her spouse who has attained the age of 18 21 years.SB524,621Section 6. 134.66 (2m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB524,5,1422134.66 (2m) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), at the time that a retailer hires 23or contracts with an agent, employee, or independent contractor whose duties will 1include the sale of cigarettes or, tobacco products, nicotine products, or electronic 2vaping devices, the retailer shall provide the agent, employee, or independent 3contractor with training on compliance with sub. (2) (a) and (am), including 4training on the penalties under sub. (4) (a) 2. (bm) for a violation of sub. (2) (a) or 5(am). The department of health services shall make available to any retailer on 6request a training program developed or approved by that department that provides 7the training required under this paragraph. A retailer may comply with this 8paragraph by providing the training program developed or approved by the 9department of health services or by providing a comparable training program 10approved by that department. At the completion of the training, the retailer and 11the agent, employee, or independent contractor shall sign a form provided by the 12department of health services verifying that the agent, employee, or independent 13contractor has received the training, which the retailer shall retain in the personnel 14file of the agent, employee, or independent contractor.SB524,715Section 7. 134.66 (3) (intro.), (a), (b) and (c) of the statutes are amended to 16read:SB524,5,2317134.66 (3) Defense; sale to minor underage individual. (intro.) Proof of 18all of the following facts by a retailer, manufacturer, distributor, jobber, or 19subjobber, an agent, employee, or independent contractor of a retailer, 20manufacturer, distributor, jobber, or subjobber, or an agent or employee of an 21independent contractor who sells cigarettes or, tobacco products, nicotine products, 22or electronic vaping devices to a person under the age of 18 21 is a defense to any 23prosecution, or a complaint made under s. 134.65 (7), for a violation of sub. (2) (a):SB524,6,21(a) That the purchaser falsely represented that he or she had attained the age 2of 18 21 and presented an identification card.SB524,6,43(b) That the appearance of the purchaser was such that an ordinary and 4prudent person would believe that the purchaser had attained the age of 18 30.SB524,6,75(c) That the sale was made in good faith, in reasonable reliance on the 6identification card and appearance of the purchaser and in the belief that the 7purchaser had attained the age of 18 21.SB524,88Section 8. 134.66 (4) (a) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 134.66 (4) (am) and 9amended to read:SB524,6,1210134.66 (4) (am) In this paragraph subsection, “violation” means a violation of 11sub. (2) (a), (am), (cm), or (e) or a local ordinance which strictly conforms to sub. (2) 12(a), (am), (cm), or (e).SB524,913Section 9. 134.66 (4) (a) 2. of the statutes is renumbered 134.66 (4) (bm).SB524,1014Section 10. 134.66 (4) (a) 3. of the statutes is renumbered 134.66 (4) (cm), 15and 134.66 (4) (cm) 1., 2. and 3., as renumbered, are amended to read:SB524,6,1716134.66 (4) (cm) 1. Not more than 3 days, if the court finds that the person 17committed a violation within 12 24 months after committing one previous violation;SB524,6,20182. Not less than 3 days nor more than 10 days, if the court finds that the 19person committed a violation within 12 24 months after committing 2 other 20violations; orSB524,6,23213. Not less than 15 days nor more than 30 days, if the court finds that the 22person committed the violation within 12 24 months after committing 3 or more 23other violations.SB524,111Section 11. 134.66 (4) (a) 4. of the statutes is renumbered 134.66 (4) (dm) 2and amended to read:SB524,7,53134.66 (4) (dm) The court shall promptly mail notice of a suspension under 4subd. 3. par. (cm) to the department of revenue and to the clerk of each municipality 5which has issued a license or permit to the person.SB524,126Section 12. 134.66 (4) (b) of the statutes is repealed.SB524,137Section 13. 139.30 (10) of the statutes is amended to read:SB524,7,98139.30 (10) “Retailer” has the meaning given in s. 134.66 (1) (g) means any 9person licensed under s. 134.65.SB524,1410Section 14. 139.345 (3) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB524,7,1211139.345 (3) (a) (intro.) Verifies the consumer’s name and address and that the 12consumer is at least 18 21 years of age by any of the following methods:SB524,1513Section 15. 139.345 (3) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB524,7,1614139.345 (3) (b) 2. That the consumer understands that no person who is under 1518 21 years of age may purchase or possess cigarettes or falsely represent his or her 16age for the purpose of receiving cigarettes, as provided under s. 254.92.SB524,1617Section 16. 139.345 (7) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB524,8,218139.345 (7) (a) No person may deliver a package of cigarettes sold by direct 19marketing to a consumer in this state unless the person making the delivery 20receives a government issued identification card from the person receiving the 21package and verifies that the person receiving the package is at least 18 21 years of 22age. If the person receiving the package is not the person to whom the package is 23addressed, the person delivering the package shall have the person receiving the 1package sign a statement that affirms that the person to whom the package is 2addressed is at least 18 21 years of age.SB524,173Section 17. Subchapter IX (title) of chapter 254 [precedes 254.911] of the 4statutes is amended to read:SB524,8,55CHAPTER 254 Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb524 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb524 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB524 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB524 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB524: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting